Nevada, session 83, AB334-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 690B of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. If an insurer requires the inspection for repair of a motor
vehicle relating to a claim by the insured or a claimant, the
insurer shall, within 8 business days after receiving the claim,
accepting liability and confirming coverage:
(a) Request that the insured, the claimant or a representative
of the selected repair shop, as applicable, make the motor vehicle
available for inspection; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, inspect the
motor vehicle.
 Within 2 business days after an inspection, the insurer shall
transmit the completed estimate which includes, without
limitation, an indication of the extent of known damages related to
the claim and manner of repair.
2. If, in response to a request for a supplemental estimate, the
insurer determines that a motor vehicle requires further
inspection, the insurer shall, within 8 business days after making
such determination:
(a) Request that the insured, the claimant or a representative
of the selected repair shop, as applicable, make the motor vehicle
available for further inspection; and
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, conduct such
further inspection of the motor vehicle.
 Within 2 business days after an inspection, the insurer shall
transmit the completed estimate which includes, without
limitation, an indication of the extent of known damages related to
the claim and manner of repair.
3. If the insured or claimant does not make a motor vehicle
available for inspection or further inspection within 8 business
days after receiving a request from the insurer pursuant to
subsection 1 or 2, the insurer shall inspect or further inspect the
-
*AB334_R3*

– 3 –
vehicle as soon as practicable after the insured or claimant makes
the motor vehicle available.
4. If an insurer fails to inspect the motor vehicle during the
period required pursuant to subsection 1, 2 or 3, as applicable, or
fails to transmit the completed estimate required pursuant to
subsection 1 or 2, as applicable, the insurer waives its right to
inspect or further inspect the motor vehicle before any repairs are
made to the vehicle. Unless the repair facility or, as applicable, the
insured or claimant allows an inspection or further inspection of
the vehicle after the period required pursuant to subsection 1, 2 or
3, negotiations for payment of the claim are limited to the cost of
labor and the price of parts unless the insurer provides objective
evidence to dispute the existence of damage or the chosen manner
of repair.
5. The insured or claimant, as applicable, may file a
complaint against the insurer with the Division if the insurer
waives its right to inspect or further inspect the vehicle and does
not limit negotiations for payment of the claim to the cost of labor
and the price of parts or provide objective evidence to dispute the
existence of the damage or the chosen manner of repair.
6. The Division may impose against an insurer an
administrative fine of not more than the actual damages or $1,200,
whichever is less, for a violation of the provisions of this section.
7. As used in this section, “inspection” means:
(a) A physical inspection; or
(b) A digital inspection which includes, without limitation, the
provision of digital photographs, videos or any other digital
evidence through an electronic processing system authorized by an
insurer that conducts the inspection of a motor vehicle.
H
-
*AB334_R3*